Washington statutes.
RCW 36.34.030

Requirements of notice—Posting.

The notice of hearing on the proposal to dispose of any county property must particularly describe the property or portion thereof proposed to be sold and designate the place where and the day and hour when a hearing will be held thereon and be posted in a conspicuous place in the courthouse. Both posting and the date of first publication must be at least ten days before the day set for the hearing.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.34.030. Prior: 1945 c 254 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 4014-2; prior: 1891 c 76 s 2, part; RRS s 4008, part.]